California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
The taxes imposed by Section 30131.2 shall be imposed on every cigarette and on tobacco products in the possession or under the control of every dealer and distributor on and after 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 1999, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added November 3, 1998, by initiative Proposition 10.   Effective (by Sec. 7 of Prop. 10) on date election results were certified.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Licenses, Bonds and Registration [30140. - 30159.]



  ARTICLE 1. Licenses and Bonds [30140. - 30149.]

30140.

Every person desiring to engage in the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products as a distributor (including a common carrier or authorized person mentioned in Section 30104), except a person who desires merely to sell or accept orders for cigarettes or tobacco products which are to be transported from a point outside this state to a consumer within this state, shall file with the board an application, in such form as the board may prescribe, for a distributor’s license. A distributor shall apply for and obtain a license for each place of business at which he or she engages in the business of distributing cigarettes or tobacco
 products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 18.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30140.1.

(a) The board may adopt rules and regulations which provide for the issuance of a license to a person who is not engaged in business in this state. 

(b) A holder of a license shall collect the tax imposed by this part, give receipts for the collected tax, and pay the tax to the board in the same manner as licensees engaged in business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 19.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30141.

Every applicant for a license as a distributor shall file with the board, security in the amount and form as the board prescribes. Any security in the form of cash, insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, or a bond or bonds duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this part and expressly providing for the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations of the person arising out of this part shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely
 in the manner provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1113, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30142.

(a) The board shall fix the amount of the security required of any distributor and may increase or reduce the amount at any time. A minimum security in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be furnished by every distributor that is required to be licensed.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if a distributor desires to defer payments for stamps or meter register settings, as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 30166) of Chapter 3.5, the board
 shall require a security as follows:

(1) If a distributor elects, under Section 30168, to make payments on a monthly basis, the board shall require a security equal to not less than 70 percent of the amount and no more than twice the amount, as fixed by the board, of the distributor’s purchases of stamps and meter register settings for which payment may be deferred.

(2) If a distributor elects, under Section 30168, to make payments on a twice-monthly basis, the board shall require a security equal to not less than 50 percent of the amount and no more than twice the amount, as fixed by the board, of the distributor’s purchases of stamps and meter register settings for which payment may be deferred.

(3) If a distributor elects, under Section 30168, to make payments on a weekly basis, the board shall require a security
 equal to not less than 25 percent of the amount and no more than twice the amount, as fixed by the board, of the distributor’s purchases of stamps and meter register settings for which payment may be deferred.

(c) The security required by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) may be in the form of any of the following, in the amount required by paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b):

(1) Cash, or a cash equivalent.

(2) A surety bond.

(d) Upon authorization by the board, no additional security shall be required for a distributor that desires to defer payments for stamps or meter register settings, as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 30166) of Chapter 3.5, if the distributor’s average monthly purchase of stamps or meter register settings
 for the previous 12 months does not exceed seventy-two thousand (72,000) stamps or meter register settings and if the distributor meets all of the following:

(1) Has been licensed under this part for a minimum of five years.

(2) Has not been delinquent in the filing of any reports or returns required under this part for the preceding three consecutive years.

(3) Has not been delinquent in the payment of any tax under this part, or for any other tax or fee administered or collected by the board, for the preceding three consecutive years.

(4) Provides to the board and updates, as necessary, an electronic mail address for the purpose of receiving payment information, including, but not limited to, amounts owing for stamps and meter register settings
 purchased.

(5) Any other criteria the board may require.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 70, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30143.

Every bond shall contain a provision substantially to the effect that when the surety exercises his right to withdraw as surety the withdrawal shall be effective on the first day of the calendar month after receipt of the notice by the board if the notice is received on or before the fifteenth day of the month, otherwise the withdrawal shall be effective on the first day of the second calendar month after receipt of the notice by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30144.

The license of any distributor may be suspended without prior notice upon cancellation of his or her bond, or if the bond becomes void or unenforceable for any reason, or if the distributor fails to pay any amounts due under this part. The license shall be reinstated if the distributor files a valid bond, provides other security as defined in Section 30141 or pays the delinquent amounts, as the case may be. Upon the petition of any distributor whose license has been suspended under this section, a hearing shall be afforded him or her after five days’ notice
 of the time and place of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1113, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30146.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the board setting forth the amount of a distributor’s delinquencies, the State Treasurer shall pay to the board the amount so certified from the money deposited with him by the distributor or from the amounts received from the sale of bonds or other obligations deposited with the Treasurer by the distributor. Securities deposited with the State Treasurer which have a prevailing market price may be sold by him for the purposes of this section at private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30147.

Upon receipt of a completed application and such bonds or other security as may be required by the board under this part, the board shall issue to the applicant a license as a distributor. A separate license shall be issued for each place of business of the distributor within the State. A license is valid only for engaging in business as a distributor at the place designated thereon, and it shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place for which issued. The license is not transferable and is valid until canceled, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30148.

Whenever any distributor fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulations of the board prescribed and adopted under this part, the board upon hearing, after giving the distributor at least 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring him to show cause why his license should not be revoked, may revoke the license held by him. The notice may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination. The board shall not issue a new license to a distributor whose license has been revoked unless it is satisfied that he will comply with the provisions of this part
 and the rules and regulations of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30149.

Any person required to obtain a license as a distributor under this chapter who engages in business as a distributor without a license or after a license has been canceled, suspended, or revoked, and each officer of any corporation which so engages in business, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration [30151. - 30151.]

30151.

Every distributor, except one to whom a license is issued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 30140), required under Section 30108 to collect the tax imposed under this part from a purchaser shall register with the board and give the names and addresses of all agents operating in this state, the location of all distribution or sales houses or offices or other places of business in this state, and such other information as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Wholesalers [30155. - 30159.]

30155.

Every person desiring to engage in the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products as a wholesaler shall file with the board an application, in that form as the board may prescribe, for a wholesaler’s license. A wholesaler shall apply for and obtain a license for each place of business at which he or she engages in the business of selling cigarettes or tobacco products as a wholesaler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30156.

No fee shall be charged nor shall a bond be required of any person for the issuance to him of a wholesaler’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1187.)
-------------------------------------------

30157.

Upon receipt of a completed application, the board shall issue to the applicant a license as a wholesaler. A separate license shall be issued for each place of business of the wholesaler within the state. A license is valid only for engaging in business as a wholesaler at the place designated thereon, and it shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place for which issued. The license is not transferable and is valid until canceled, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1187.)
-------------------------------------------

30158.

Whenever any wholesaler fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the board prescribed and adopted under this part, the board upon hearing, after giving the wholesaler at least 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring him to show cause why his license should not be revoked or suspended, may revoke or suspend the license held by him. The notice may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination. The board shall not issue a license to a wholesaler whose license has been revoked or suspended unless it is satisfied that he will comply
 with the provisions of this part and the rules and regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

30159.

Any person required to obtain a license as a wholesaler under this part who engages in business as a wholesaler without a license or after a license has been canceled, suspended, or revoked, and each officer of any corporation which so engages in business, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1187.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Stamps and Meter Machines [30161. - 30180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Use of Stamps and Impressions [30161. - 30165.2.]

30161.

Except for the use or consumption of cigarettes by other than a licensed distributor, and as may be authorized under the provisions of Section 30165, the tax imposed by this part with respect to distributions of cigarettes shall be paid by distributors through the use of stamps or meter impressions. The board shall furnish stamps for sale and provide for the sale of meter register settings for metering machines approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30162.

(a) Stamps and meter impressions shall be of the designs, specifications, and denominations as may be prescribed by the board. Stamps and meter impressions shall be generated by a technology capable of being read by a scanning or similar device and shall be encrypted with, at a minimum, the following information:

(1) The name and address of the distributor affixing the stamp or meter impression.

(2) The date the stamp or meter impression was affixed.

(3) The denominated value of the stamp or meter impression.

(b) The board shall prescribe by regulation the method and manner in which stamps or meter impressions are to be affixed to packages of cigarettes and may provide for the cancellation of stamps or meter impressions.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30163.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appropriate stamp shall be affixed to, or an appropriate meter impression shall be made on each package of cigarettes prior to the distribution of the cigarettes.

(b) No stamp or meter impression may be affixed to, or made upon, any package of cigarettes if any one of the following occurs:

(1) The package does not comply with all requirements of the Federal
 Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1331 and following) for the placement of labels, warnings, or any other information upon a package of cigarettes that is to be sold within the United States.

(2) The package is labeled “For Export Only,” “U.S. Tax Exempt,” “For Use Outside U.S.,” or similar wording indicating that the manufacturer did not intend that the product be sold in the United States.

(3) The package, or a package containing individually stamped packages, has been altered by adding or deleting the wording, labels, or warnings described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(4) The package was imported into the United States after January 1, 2000, in violation of Section 5754 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(5) (A) The package bears a cigarette brand name which is a registered U.S. trademark of a participating manufacturer and the package was imported by anyone other than the participating manufacturer of that cigarette brand.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “participating manufacturer” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 104557 of the Health and Safety Code and in Section II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Pursuant to its authority under Section 30148, the board shall revoke the license issued to a distributor that is determined to be in violation of this section.

(d) A violation of subdivision (b) shall constitute unfair
 competition under Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   Effective May 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

30164.

A metering machine may be used and a meter may be stored, transferred, transported, repaired, opened, set or used only in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the board. Meters, meter register settings, or unaffixed stamps shall not be sold, exchanged or in any manner transferred by a distributor to another person without prior written approval of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30165.

The board by regulation may provide that the tax imposed by this part with respect to cigarettes shall be paid without the use of stamps or meter impressions in connection with a particular type of transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30165.1.

(a) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(2) “Brand family” means styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers, including, but not limited to, “menthol,” “lights,” “kings,” and “100s,” and includes any brand name, alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes.

(3) “Brand style” means any particular combination of trademark and modifiers within a brand family.

(4) “Cigarette” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code and includes tobacco products defined as a cigarette under that subdivision.

(5) “Directory” means the California Tobacco Directory developed by the Attorney General and published on its internet website pursuant to subdivision (c). 

(6) “Distributor” has the same meaning as in Section 30011.

(7) “MSA” means the Master Settlement Agreement, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) “Nonparticipating manufacturer” means any tobacco product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer.

(9) “Participating manufacturer” has the same meaning as in subsection II(jj) of the MSA.

(10) “Qualified escrow fund” has the same meaning as in subdivision (f) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code.

(11) “Tobacco product manufacturer” has the same meaning as in subdivision (i) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code.

(12) “Units sold” has the same meaning as in subdivision (j) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Every tobacco product manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this state, whether directly or through a
 distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, shall execute and deliver on a form and in the manner prescribed by the Attorney General, a certification to the Attorney General no later than April 30 of each year that, as of the date of the certification, the tobacco product manufacturer is either a participating manufacturer that has made all payments calculated by the independent auditor to be due under the Master Settlement Agreement, except to the extent the participating manufacturer is disputing any of the payments, or is a nonparticipating manufacturer in full compliance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, including all installment payments required by that article and this section, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions. A tobacco product manufacturer located outside of the United States shall provide to the Attorney General and keep current, the names, and addresses, including email
 addresses, of all importers that sell or will be selling their cigarettes in this state and shall cause each importer to provide to the Attorney General a copy of a valid importer permit issued by the United States Treasury, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau, and the importer license issued by the department. The importers who sell or will be selling their cigarettes in this state shall obtain and maintain a license as an importer in compliance with Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code. Any person who makes a certification pursuant to this subdivision that asserts the truth of any material matter that the person knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in the county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and the fine.

(1) A participating manufacturer shall include in its certification a complete
 list of its brand families and brand styles. The participating manufacturer shall update the list 30 days before any addition to or modification of its brand families and brand styles by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the Attorney General.

(2) A nonparticipating manufacturer shall include in its certification a complete list of all of its brand families and brand styles in accordance with all of the following requirements:

(A) Separately listing brand families and brand styles of cigarettes and the number of units sold for each brand family that were sold in the state during the preceding calendar year.

(B) Separately listing all of its brand families and brand styles that have been sold in the state at any time during the current calendar year.

(C) Indicating by an asterisk any brand family or brand style sold in the state during the preceding calendar year that is no longer being sold in the state as of the date of the certification.

(D) Identifying by name and address any other tobacco product manufacturer, including all previous fabricators or makers of the brand families, in a form, manner, and detail as required by the Attorney General. The tobacco product manufacturer shall update the list 30 days before any change in a fabricator for any brand family or any addition to or modification of its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the Attorney General.

(3) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the certification shall further certify all of the following:

(A) That the nonparticipating manufacturer is registered to do business in the state, or has appointed a resident agent for service of process and provided notice thereof as required by subdivision (f).

(B) That the nonparticipating manufacturer has done all of the following:

(i) Established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund as that term is defined in subdivision (f) of Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code and implementing regulations.

(ii) Executed a qualified escrow agreement that has been reviewed and approved by the Attorney General and that governs the qualified escrow fund.

(iii) The certifying nonparticipating manufacturer fabricates all of the brand families of the cigarettes it seeks to certify.

(C) That the nonparticipating manufacturer is in full compliance with both of the following:

(i) Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, including paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 104557 of the Health and Safety Code, this section, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(ii) Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall also provide a copy of a valid, corresponding federal permit issued by the United States Treasury, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.

(D) That the nonparticipating manufacturer has provided all of
 the following:

(i) The name, address, and telephone number of the financial institution where the nonparticipating manufacturer has established the qualified escrow fund required pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code and all regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(ii) The account number of the qualified escrow fund and subaccount number for the State of California.

(iii) The amount the nonparticipating manufacturer placed in the qualified escrow fund for cigarettes sold in the state during the preceding calendar year, the date and amount of each deposit, and any confirming evidence or verification as may be deemed necessary by the Attorney General.

(iv) The
 amounts and dates of any withdrawal or transfer of funds the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time from the qualified escrow fund or from any other qualified escrow fund into which it ever made escrow payments pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code and all regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(E) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer located outside the United States, that the manufacturer has provided a declaration in a form prescribed by the Attorney General from each of its importers into the United States of any of its brand families to be sold in the state, that the importer accepts joint and several liability with the nonparticipating manufacturer for all escrow deposits due and all penalties assessed in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety
 Code, and for payment of all fees, costs, attorney’s fees, penalties, and refunds imposed or required under this section, including, but not limited to, all refunds resulting from the removal of the nonparticipating manufacturer or any of its brand families or brand styles from the Directory. The declaration shall appoint for the declarant a resident agent for service of process in California in accordance with subdivision (f) and affirm that the declarant has caused every importer that will sell its cigarettes in this state to obtain and maintain a license as an importer pursuant to Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) (A) A tobacco product manufacturer may not include a brand family in its certification unless either of the following is true:

(i) In the case of a participating manufacturer, the participating
 manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of calculating its payments under the MSA for the relevant year, in the volume and shares determined pursuant to the MSA.

(ii) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, including paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 104557 of the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(B) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or otherwise affecting the state’s right to maintain that a brand family constitutes cigarettes of a different tobacco product manufacturer for purposes of calculating payments under the
 MSA or for purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(5) A tobacco product manufacturer shall maintain all invoices and documentation of sales and other information relied upon for the certification for a period of five years, unless otherwise required by law to maintain them for a longer period of time.

(c) The Attorney General shall develop and publish on its internet website the California Tobacco Directory, which shall list only the tobacco product manufacturers, brand families, and brand styles of cigarettes that are compliant with this section and Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(1) The Attorney General may not include or retain in the Directory the name, brand families, or brand styles of any of the following:

(A) Any participating manufacturer that fails to provide the required certification or to make a payment calculated by the independent auditor to be due from it under the MSA except to the extent that it is disputing the payment.

(B) Any nonparticipating manufacturer that fails to provide the required certification or whose certification the Attorney General determines is not in compliance with subdivision (b), unless the Attorney General has determined that the violation has been cured to the satisfaction of the Attorney General.

(C) A tobacco product manufacturer that does not hold a valid and current manufacturer’s
 license under Section 22979 of the Business and Professions Code, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer whose license has been revoked under subdivision (g) of Section 22979 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style shall not be included or retained in the Directory if the Attorney General concludes that any of the following is true:

(A) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, any escrow deposit required pursuant to Section 104557 of the Health and Safety Code for any period for any brand family, whether or not listed by the nonparticipating manufacturer, has not been fully deposited into a qualified escrow fund governed by a qualified escrow agreement that has been approved by the Attorney General.

(B) Any outstanding final judgment,
 including interest thereon, for violations of Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, this section, Sections 30101.7 and 30165.2, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those sections, has not been fully satisfied for the brand family and the tobacco product manufacturer.

(C) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer by reason of the business plan, business history, trade connections, or compliance and payment history in the state or any other state of any of the principals thereof, the nonparticipating manufacturer fails to provide reasonable assurance that it will comply with the requirements of this section, Section 30165.2, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code. As used in this section, “reasonable assurance” may include information and documentation establishing to the satisfaction of
 the Attorney General that a failure to pay in California or elsewhere was the result of a good faith dispute over the payment obligation.

(D) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the nonparticipating manufacturer has knowingly failed to disclose any material information required or knowingly made any material false statements in the certification of any supporting information or documentation provided.

(E) If the tobacco product manufacturer or its importer, as defined in Section 30019, engages in delivery sales and the tobacco product manufacturer fails to provide or fails to cause its importer to provide reasonable assurances that the delivery seller has fully complied with all requirements of applicable federal and state law, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Chapter 10A
 (commencing with Section 375) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(ii) The requirements of Section 30101.7.

(iii) All stamping, marking, and labeling requirements, including, but not limited to, Section 30163, and any other information or indicia requirements imposed by state or federal law.

(iv) All other state laws generally applicable to the sale and distribution of tobacco products.

(3) The Attorney General may not include or retain in the Directory any brand style that has not been tested and marked in compliance with the California Cigarette Fire Safety and Firefighter Protection Act (Part 8 (commencing with Section 14950) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code).

(4) All
 listings on the Directory shall expire on April 29 of each year. Beginning with the 2023 calendar year, a tobacco product manufacturer shall renew its listing on the Directory by providing the annual certification in compliance with this section and remitting an annual fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per tobacco product manufacturer payable to the Office of the Attorney General. Any fees received pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the California Tobacco Directory Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all amounts deposited in the California Tobacco Directory Fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to the Office of the Attorney General for the purpose of administering the Directory. The Attorney General may retain a listing for a tobacco product manufacturer on the Directory while the renewal for the certification is pending, provided that if the Attorney General decides not to retain a
 listing of any manufacturer or brand family while the renewal of the certification is pending, the Attorney General shall comply with the delisting provisions in this section, including paragraph (5).

(5) The Attorney General shall update the Directory as necessary in order to correct mistakes and to add or remove a tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style to keep the Directory in conformity with the requirements of this section, Section 30165.2, Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, and the California Cigarette Fire Safety and Firefighter Protection Act (Part 8 (commencing with Section 14950) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code). The Attorney General shall promptly provide distributors and wholesalers with written notice of each tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, and brand style that the Attorney General has added to, or excluded or
 removed from, the Directory.

(A) When the Attorney General’s office informs a manufacturer that it will recommend to the Attorney General that the manufacturer or brand family be delisted for cause, the office shall transmit by email, or other practicable means, a copy of the notice of the pending administrative action to the manufacturer, all licensed distributors and wholesalers, and to any retailer or other person who has provided an email address to the Attorney General for this purpose.

(B) A licensed distributor may purchase, stamp, or sell, and a licensed wholesaler may purchase or sell, products affected by the notice of pending administrative action for no more than 40 days following issuance of the notice of pending administrative action. Before the sale of a product affected by the notice of pending administrative action, and no later than seven days after the notice of
 pending administrative action, a distributor or wholesaler shall notify each of its existing customers of the pending administrative action.

(C) Upon removal from the Directory of a tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style, the Attorney General shall transmit by email, or other practicable means, a notice of removal, to the manufacturer, all licensed distributors and wholesalers, and to any retailer or other person who has provided an email address to the Attorney General for this purpose. No later than seven days after issuance of the notice of removal, a distributor or wholesaler shall provide each of its existing customers a copy of the notice of removal.

(D) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a licensed retailer may possess, transport, and sell the tax-stamped cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style affected by the notice of
 removal for no more than 60 days following the effective date of the tobacco product manufacturer’s brand family’s or brand style’s removal from the Directory.

(E) After 60 days following removal from the Directory, the cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style identified in the notice of removal are contraband and are subject to seizure and destruction under subdivision (e) of Section 30436 and subdivision (b) of Section 30449, and may not be purchased or sold in the state. This section does not limit or otherwise change the seizure and destruction process of cigarettes under Sections 14950 to 14959, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, Section 14956 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) If the Attorney General declines to remove a tobacco product manufacturer, brand family, or brand style from the Directory
 following issuance of the notice of pending administrative action described in subparagraph (A), the Attorney General shall notify by email, or other practicable means, the tobacco product manufacturer, all licensed distributors and wholesalers, and any retailer or other person who has provided an email address to the Attorney General for this purpose, of the decision not to pursue administrative action. No later than seven days after issuance of this notice, a distributor or wholesaler shall provide each of its existing customers a copy of this notice, and the purchase, stamping, and sales restrictions imposed by subparagraph (B) shall have no further effect.

(G) Upon request of the Attorney General, the department shall provide the Attorney General all email addresses for licensed distributors, wholesalers, and retailers in the department’s possession.

(6) Newly qualified and
 elevated-risk nonparticipating manufacturers shall file with the Attorney General a surety bond in a form and manner directed by the Attorney General.

(A) Notwithstanding any other law, if a newly qualified nonparticipating manufacturer is to be listed in the Directory or if the Attorney General reasonably determines that any nonparticipating manufacturer who has filed a certification pursuant to subdivision (b) poses an elevated risk for noncompliance with this section, Section 30165.2, Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2, or with Article 3 (commencing with Section 104555) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, neither the nonparticipating manufacturer nor any of its brand families shall be included in the Directory unless and until the nonparticipating manufacturer, or its United States importer that undertakes joint and several liability for the nonparticipating manufacturer’s performance in
 accordance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), has posted a bond in accordance with this section.
